Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 19-9-101.
Creation and composition of military department; laws governing national guard.

The Wyoming national guard is governed by the laws of the state, orders of the governor, orders and regulations prescribed or promulgated by the adjutant general and by the applicable laws, regulations and customs covering the United States army and air force.

The governor is commander in chief of all the military forces of the state except when the forces are called into the service of the United States.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 163, §§ 1, 24; R.S. 1931, §§ 73-101, 73-124; Laws 1939, ch. 28, § 1; C.S. 1945, §§ 30-101, 30-126; W.S. 1957, §§ 19-17, 19-28, 19-78.5, 19-78.6; Laws 1969, ch. 72, §§ 5, 6; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-2-201

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.

§ 19-9-102.
Organization of national guard; duty of governor.

The Wyoming national guard consists of the following officers and staff in addition to or in combination with such elements of the army and air forces of the national guard of the United States as are allocated to the state by the president, the secretary of defense or the secretary of army or air, and accepted by the state:

An adjutant general;

Those assistant adjutants general and general officers appointed pursuant to W.S. 19-7-104(a);

One (1) staff officer, subordinate to the adjutant general, designated as the staff judge advocate whose powers and duties shall be provided by the laws of this state and as prescribed by the laws and regulations of the United States pertaining to similar staff positions in United States army and air commands;

Such other officers and enlisted members as may be designated by the governor in an honorary status or in a state status without regard to their allocation or qualification by the department of defense of the United States.

The national guard shall be organized into separate divisions for army and air with an officer not over the grade of brigadier general at the head of each division who is subordinate to the adjutant general. Each division head shall be an assistant adjutant general who shall serve as the acting adjutant general, in order of rank, upon absence, incapacity or death of the adjutant general. The governor, by and with the advice of the adjutant general, shall make and publish such orders as necessary to conform the national guard of Wyoming in organization, armament and discipline to that prescribed for the regular army or air force of the United States, subject to general exceptions authorized by this act and by the laws of the United States. For this purpose, the governor may increase or decrease the number of officers, noncommissioned officers and personnel of any grade to the extent made necessary by changes authorized by department of defense orders or national guard regulations.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 163, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 73-104; C.S. 1945, § 30-105; W.S. 1957, §§ 19-14, 19-78.7; Laws 1961, ch. 96, § 1; 1969, ch. 72, § 7; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-2-202

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2003, ch. 19, § 1; 2007, ch. 22, § 1; 2017 ch. 45, § 1, effective February 17, 2017.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a)(iv), inserted “and enlisted members” and substituted “designated” for “commissioned.”

The 2017 amendment,

in (a)(ii), substituted “Those assistant” for “Two (2) assistant,” and inserted “and general officers.”

Laws 2017, ch. 45, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Art. 4, § 8, Wy. Const. Approved Feb. 17, 2017.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 19-7-101(a)(xii).

§ 19-9-103.
Manner of calling for duty.

Officers and enlisted personnel may be called for duty by any of the following means:

By stating the substance of the order or by reading it to him in person or over the phone;

By radio or television communication;

By leaving a copy of the order with a person over the age of fourteen (14) years at his last known place of residence or business; or

By sending a copy of the order or the substance of the order by electronic means to him at his last known place of residence or business or by United States mail to his last known address.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears on the printed act.